Hawaii, session 2026, HB1764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) There is established the music accessibility pilot program within the Hawaii state public library system.  Under the pilot program, the Hawaii state public library system shall expand access to public concerts and musical education throughout the State, ensuring that residents in the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui have access to public concerts and musical education; support local musicians and cultural collaboration; and encourage the commission of new works that reflect Hawaii's unique heritage.  The Hawaii state public library system may collaborate with the Hawaii Symphony Orchestra and other organizations to implement the pilot program. (b)  The Hawaii state public library system shall submit the following reports to the legislature: (1)  A progress report on the music accessibility pilot program no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027; and (2)  A final report of findings and recommendations, including a recommendation as to whether the pilot program should be extended, modified, or discontinued, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028. (c) The music accessibility pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2028. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $600,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the music accessibility pilot program, including for costs associated with travel expenses and payment to musicians for public concerts; provided that this appropriation shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided further that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state public library system for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________